Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.315

Rule-making docket.

(1) Each agency shall maintain a current public rule-making docket. The rule-making docket shall contain the information specified in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) The rule-making docket shall contain a listing of each pending rule-making proceeding. A rule-making proceeding is pending from the time it is commenced by publication of a notice of proposed rule adoption under RCW 34.05.320 until the proposed rule is withdrawn under RCW 34.05.335 or is adopted by the agency.

(3) For each rule-making proceeding, the docket shall indicate all of the following:

(a) The name and address of agency personnel responsible for the proposed rule;

(b) The subject of the proposed rule;

(c) A citation to all notices relating to the proceeding that have been published in the state register under RCW 34.05.320;

(d) The place where written submissions about the proposed rule may be inspected;

(e) The time during which written submissions will be accepted;

(f) The current timetable established for the agency proceeding, including the time and place of any rule-making hearing, the date of the rule's adoption, filing, publication, and its effective date.

[ 1989 c 175 s 6; 1988 c 288 s 302.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.